Florida, session 2026, SB444.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (w) is added to subsection (2) of 14 section 1003.42, Florida Statutes, to read: 15 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 16 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 17 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 18 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 19 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 20 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 21 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 22 approved methods of instruction, the following: 23 (w)1.âFor students in grades 2 through 5, the study of 24 cursive writing and the development of the skills necessary for 25 legible cursive writing, including: 26 a.âLetter formation. 27 b.âProper spacing and alignment. 28 c.âPractice in writing complete words and sentences in 29 cursive. 30 2.âBy the end of grade 5, each student must demonstrate 31 proficiency in cursive writing through an evaluation of written 32 work. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term âproficiency 33 in cursive writingâ means all of the following: 34 a.âThe ability to write uppercase and lowercase letters of 35 the alphabet in cursive writing. 36 b.âWriting words and sentences in cursive legibly and 37 maintaining proper spacing and alignment. 38 c.âThe ability to read and apply cursive writing in a 39 manner that supports literacy development, including writing 40 essays and assignments in cursive writing in accordance with 41 state academic standards. 42 43 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 44 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 45 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 46 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 47 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 48 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 49 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 50 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.